Utah statutes.
41-1a-215.   Staggered registration dates -- Exceptions.
(1) (a)  Except as provided under Subsections (2) and (3), every vehicle
registration, every registration card, and every registration plate issued
under this chapter for the first registration of the vehicle in this state,
continues in effect for a period of 12 months beginning with the first day of
the calendar month of registration and does not expire until the last day of
the same month in the following year.
(b)  If the last day of the registration period falls on a day in which the
appropriate state or county offices are not open for business, the
registration of the vehicle is extended to midnight of the next business day.
(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) do not apply to the following:
(a)  registration issued to government vehicles under Section 41-1a-221;
(b)  registration issued to apportioned vehicles under Section 41-1a-301;
(c)  multiyear registration issued under Section 41-1a-222;
(d)  lifetime trailer registration issued under Section 41-1a-1206;
(e)  partial year registration issued under Section 41-1a-1207;
(f)  registration issued under Section 41-1a-215.5; or
(g)  plates issued to a dealer, dismantler, manufacturer, remanufacturer, and
transporter under Title 41, Chapter 3, Part 5, Special Dealer License Plates.
(3)  Upon application of the owner or lessee of a fleet of commercial vehicles
not apportioned under Section 41-1a-301 and required to be registered in this
state, the State Tax Commission may permit the vehicles to be registered for a
registration period commencing on the first day of March, June, September, or
December of any year and expiring on the last day of March, June, September,
or December in the following year.
(4)  When the expiration of a registration plate is extended by affixing a
registration decal to it, the expiration of the decal governs the expiration
date of the plate.
